Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-2133
Bonds; obligee; causes of action.

An obligee of an authority shall have the right in addition to all other rights which may be conferred upon such obligee, subject only to any contractual restrictions binding upon such obligee:

(1) By mandamus, suit, action, or proceeding at law or in equity to compel such authority and the members, officers, agents, or employees thereof to perform each and every term, provision, and covenant contained in any contract of such authority with or for the benefit of such obligee, and to require the carrying out of any or all such covenants and agreements to the authority and the fulfillment of all duties imposed upon the authority by the Community Development Law; and

(2) By suit, action, or proceeding in equity to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful, or the violation of any of the rights of such obligee of the authority.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 13, p. 816;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1633;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2633;

Laws 2018, LB874, § 24;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 137.